Maryland, session 2025, HB0213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–218.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0213*

HOUSE BILL 213
(A) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(1) THE STATE IS COMMITTED TO ACHIEVING THE GOAL OF MEETING
100% OF ITS ENERGY NEEDS THROUGH RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES AND
SOURCES WITH NET–ZERO EMISSIONS;
(2) THE CURRENT ENERGY GENERATION INFRASTRUCTURE MAY
FACE CHALLENGES IN THE SHORT TERM IN MEETING THE STATE’S GROWING
ENERGY NEEDS SOLELY FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES;
(3) TO ENSURE ENERGY RELIABILITY AND SECURITY, IT IS
NECESSARY TO TEMPORARILY ALLOW THE CONSTRUCTION OF ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEMS THAT PRODUCE ENERGY FROM NATURAL GAS WHILE
ENERGY CAPACITY FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES CONTINUES TO GROW;
AND
(4) NATURAL GAS PROVIDES A MORE RELIABLE AND LOWER–CARBON
ALTERNATIVE COMPARED TO COAL AND OIL, OFFERING A TRANSITIONAL SOLUTION
AS THE STATE WORKS TO ACHIEVE ITS LONG–TERM CLIMATE AND ENERGY GOALS.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AND SUBJECT TO
SUBSECTIONS (C), (D), (E), AND (F) OF THIS SECTION, ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEMS THAT PRODUCE ENERGY FROM NATURAL GAS MAY BE CONSTRUCTED,
PERMITTED, AND OPERATED UNTIL THE STATE REACHES THE GOAL OF MEETING
100% OF ITS ENERGY NEEDS FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES, INCLUDING
NUCLEAR ENERGY.
(C) A PERSON CONSTRUCTING AN ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL COMPLY WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE RELATING
TO REQUIREMENTS TO OBTAIN:
(1) A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY; OR
(2) COMMISSION APPROVAL FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE
GENERATING SYSTEM.
(D) (1) (I) IN ADDITION TO ANY APPROVAL NECESSARY TO COMPLY
WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON SHALL OBTAIN APPROVAL FROM
THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT BEFORE CONSTRUCTING AN ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM THAT PRODUCES ENERGY FROM NATURAL GAS.
(II) WHEN A PERSON APPLIES FOR APPROVAL UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE PERSON SHALL PROVIDE TO THE

HOUSE BILL 213 3
DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT A TRANSITION PLAN OUTLINING HOW THE
SYSTEM WILL BE DECOMMISSIONED OR TRANSITIONED TO PRODUCE ENERGY
SOLELY FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES WHEN THE STATE REACHES THE
GOAL OF MEETING 100% OF ITS ENERGY NEEDS FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY
RESOURCES.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT SHALL REVIEW
AND APPROVE OR DENY AN APPLICATION FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A NEW
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT PRODUCES ENERGY FROM NATURAL GAS.
(II) IN APPROVING OR DENYING AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT SHALL
CONSIDER:
1. THE ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT OF THE SYSTEM; AND
2. WHETHER THE SYSTEM IS NECESSARY TO MEET THE
STATE’S ENERGY NEEDS.
(E) AN ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT PRODUCES ENERGY FROM
NATURAL GAS SHALL USE THE BEST AVAILABLE EMISSIONS CONTROL
TECHNOLOGIES TO MINIMIZE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS.
(F) (1) AN ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT PRODUCES ENERGY
FROM NATURAL GAS MAY NOT BE CONSTRUCTED, PERMITTED, OR OPERATED AFTER
THE STATE REACHES THE GOAL OF MEETING 100% OF ITS ENERGY NEEDS FROM
RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES.
(2) WITHIN 10 YEARS AFTER THE STATE REACHES THE GOAL OF
MEETING 100% OF ITS ENERGY NEEDS FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES,
EACH ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT PRODUCES ENERGY FROM NATURAL GAS
SHALL BE:
(I) DECOMMISSIONED; OR
(II) TRANSITIONED TO A SYSTEM THAT PRODUCES ENERGY
SOLELY FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES.
(G) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT, SHALL SUBMIT AN
ANNUAL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE:

HOUSE BILL 213
(1) ON THE PROGRESS MADE TOWARD MEETING THE STATE’S
RENEWABLE ENERGY GOALS;
(2) ON THE ROLE OF ENERGY GENERATED FROM NATURAL GAS IN THE
STATE’S ENERGY PORTFOLIO; AND
(3) THAT INCLUDES UPDATED PROJECTIONS ON WHEN THE STATE
WILL REACH ITS GOAL OF MEETING 100% OF ITS ENERGY NEEDS THROUGH
RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that, to the extent that the provisions of this Act are inconsistent with any other
provision of law, the provisions of this Act will prevail.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.